createYaml/yaml_output/VTA_IND_S.yaml
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigonaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigonaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiininaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigoninaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigonaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigosiiminaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigominaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigosiiminaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigominaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiininaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigoninaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigosiiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigominaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigosiiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigominaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisisinooninimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisininimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisisinooninaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisininaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishi1siimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishi1mwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaawaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishi1siiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishi1minaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishi1siinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishi1naadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishi1siiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishi1minaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigodogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigodogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaasiwaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigosiiwaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigowaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigosiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigodogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigodog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigodog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaasiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoomwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaanaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiwaanaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaanaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaanaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaanaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaanaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaanaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaanaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiimwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoomwaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mawadisaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mawadisaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: nimawadisigoosiiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: nimawadisigoominaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: gimawadisigoosiiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: gimawadisigoominaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigonan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigonan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiinini
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigonini
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigonan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiinini
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigonini
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisisinooninim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisininim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisisinoon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishi1siim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishi1m
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaawaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishi1siimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishi1min
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishi1siin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishi1
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishi1siimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishi1min
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigoog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigoog
